Tennessee, session 114, SB0380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-82-307(b)(5)(A), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (i) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (ii):
(ii) If a person becomes ineligible to serve as a utility district commissioner under
subdivision (b)(5)(A)(i) for failing to timely meet the training and continuing education
requirements set forth in § 7-82-308, the person may file a petition for reinstatement of
the person's eligibility to serve as a utility district commissioner with the Tennessee
board of utility regulation. The person shall not file a petition for reinstatement until after
the completion of the term of office for which the person has failed to meet the required
training and continuing education requirements that caused the person's ineligibility to
serve. The board shall conduct an informal hearing on the petition and may issue an
order establishing the terms and conditions for the reinstatement of eligibility. The order
must require the petitioner to obtain twelve (12) hours of training and continuing
education within one (1) year of the date of the order, must include an effective date for
eligibility reinstatement, and may include any other terms and conditions for
reinstatement deemed appropriate by the board.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-82-702(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
SB0380
000821
- 1 -

( ) Petitions for reinstatement of a person's eligibility to serve as a utility district
commissioner pursuant to § 7-82-307(b)(5)(A)(ii).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-34-115(j)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "twelve (12)" and substituting instead "six (6)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-82-308(f)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "twelve (12)" and substituting instead "six (6)".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000821